Wyoming, session 2026, SF0091.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-30-101 through 9-30-105 are created
to read:

CHAPTER 30
ENERGY PROJECT FUNDING

SF0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0405
9-30-101. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Wyoming
Energy Project Accountability Act."

9-30-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Energy project" means a project that
generates, stores, transmits, converts or delivers electric
energy from sources including wind, solar, natural gas,
coal, nuclear and hydrogen sources. "Energy project"
includes associated infrastructure, transmission
infrastructure and energy projects created pursuant to W.S.
37-5-501 through 37-5-509;

(ii) "Industrial-scale generation facility"
means a facility or project that produces electricity and
that meets any one (1) or more of the following thresholds:

(A) Maintains not less than one hundred
fifty (150) megawatts of nameplate generation capacity;
SF0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0405

(B) For a wind energy facility, maintains a
project footprint of not less than five thousand (5,000)
acres; or

(C) For a solar energy facility, maintains
a project footprint of not less than five hundred (500)
acres.

(iii) "Large industrial power load" means a new
or expanded electric load, whether served at one (1) site
or a related campus, that is reasonably expected to
require:

(A) Not less than seventy-five (75)
megawatts of peak demand;

(B) Not less than one hundred (100)
megawatts of peak demand when aggregated across related
facilities under common ownership or control that are
served through the same substation, feeder or point of
interconnection or that are part of a single integrated
SF0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0405
development plan, phased or constructed within five (5)
years.

(iv) "Legislative approval" means authorization
by enactment of a bill or resolution containing no other
subjects, solely for the purpose of approving a specific
project or multiple projects or a specific appropriation of
state funds, which may include conditions to protect
ratepayers, grid reliability, land use and public
transparency;

(v) "Project footprint" means the total acreage
within the project boundary owned, under lease, easement,
right-of-way or other control by the project owner or
operator for turbines, panels, substations, collector
systems, transmission, access roads, operations facilities
and required setbacks;

(vi) "State action" means any grant, loan, loan
guarantee, tax incentive, financing, bond, appropriation by
the state that materially enables construction,
interconnection or service of an industrial-scale
SF0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0405
generation facility or large industrial power load covered
by this section;

(vii) "State funds" means any money from the
general fund, special revenue funds, permanent funds,
revolving funds or any other funds under the control of the
state or any state agency, including grants, loans, loan
guarantees, tax expenditures, bonding authority or credit
support;

(viii) "Uprates" means upgrades in power or
increases in power output;

(ix) "This act" means W.S. 9-30-101 through
9-30-105.

9-30-103. Legislative approval required for
industrial-scale projects and large industrial power loads.

(a) Legislative approval through a bill or resolution
as required in this act containing a specific or multiple
projects must be approved by the legislature before
construction may begin.
SF0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0405

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
public utility shall be required to serve a large
industrial power load, but may do so upon legislative
approval.

9-30-104. Bill required for state funds for any
energy project.

(a) No state agency, instrumentality or political
subdivision of the state shall obligate, expend, grant,
loan, guarantee, pledge or otherwise allocate state funds
for an energy project unless the legislature has approved
that specific expenditure, appropriation, grant, loan,
guarantee or pledge.

(b) Legislative approval shall require, at a minimum,
a bill or resolution which shall identify:

(i) The project(s), sponsor(s) and project(s)
location(s);

(ii) The amount, type and source of state funds;
SF0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0405

(iii) The intended use of funds;

(iv) Any conditions, performance requirements,
reporting, clawback or repayment terms; and

(v) Whether and how the project(s) will ensure
that incremental costs are not shifted to other ratepayers.

(c) Any documents provided to a state agency or
instrumentality to gain approval for an energy project
shall be provided to the legislature.

(d) This section applies regardless of project size
and applies to any commitment made directly or indirectly
through state funds in a cumulative amount not less than
two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) unless expressly
exempted by W.S. 9-30-105.

(e) The joint minerals, business and economic
development interim committee or the joint corporations,
elections and political subdivisions interim committee
SF0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0405
shall develop and introduce legislation as necessary to
meet the requirements of this section.

9-30-105. Exceptions; emergency; routine.

(a) Legislative approval shall not be required in the
following circumstances:

(i) Where the public service commission, due to
unforeseen circumstances or emergency, declares that
available energy production capacity is insufficient to
meet energy demand. The public service commission may
consult with appropriate agencies in making this
determination;

(ii) Where routine maintenance, replacement in
kind or uprates on an existing energy project do not exceed
the thresholds in W.S. 9-30-102(a).

Section 2. W.S. 9-12-104 by creating a new subsection
(c) and 37-5-502(g) by creating a new paragraph (iv) are
amended to read:

SF0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0405
9-12-104. General powers and duties of the council.

(c) The council shall comply with the Wyoming energy
project accountability act before awarding, granting,
investing or lending any funds under this act for energy
projects as defined by W.S. 9-30-102(a)(ii).

37-5-502. Wyoming energy authority.

(g) The authority is subject to the requirements of:

(iv) W.S. 9-30-101 through 9-30-105.

Section 3. The public service commission shall
promulgate rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
alter, amend or impair any contract or other agreement
entered into before the effective date of this act.

Section 5. This act shall apply to any
industrial-scale generation facility or large industrial
SF0091

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0405
power load for which a state action is first sought on or
after July 1, 2026.

Section 6. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0091